Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 3. Finfish Farming.

Sec. 16.40.210.
Finfish farming prohibited.

A person may not grow or cultivate finfish in captivity or under positive control for commercial purposes.

This section does not restrict

the fishery rehabilitation, enhancement, or development activities of the department;

the ability of a nonprofit corporation that holds a salmon hatchery permit under AS

16.10.400

to sell salmon returning from the natural water of the state, as authorized under AS

16.10.450

, or surplus salmon eggs, as authorized under AS

16.10.420

and

16.10.450

;

rearing and sale of ornamental finfish for aquariums or ornamental ponds provided that the fish are not reared in or released into water of the state.

In this section “ornamental finfish” means fish commonly known as “tropical fish,” “aquarium fish,” or “goldfish,” that are imported, cultured, or sold in the state customarily for viewing in aquaria or for raising in artificial systems, and not customarily used for sport fishing or human consumption purposes.

History.

(§ 2 ch 91 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 91, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.